Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Article 4. Reporter

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts § 4.

77 C.J.S. Reports §§ 9 to 13.

§ 5-3-401.
Office created; appointment; term.

The office of official
court reporter for each judge of each judicial district in the state
of Wyoming is hereby created and each judge of each judicial district
in the state of Wyoming is hereby required and empowered to appoint
one (1) court reporter for his district, whose term of office shall
be during the pleasure of the judge making such appointment and until
their successor is appointed and qualified.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 152, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 940; C.S. 1920, § 1166; R.S. 1931, § 31-237; C.S. 1945, § 1-622; Laws 1955, ch. 114, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-77.

Cross references. —

As to stenographic report or transcript as evidence, see Rule 80, W.R.C.P.

Reporter is court officer. —

The court reporter is a regularly appointed and sworn officer of the court. Harris v. State, 23 Wyo. 487, 153 P. 881,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1916).

Cited

in

Harris v. State, 23 Wyo. 487, 153 P. 881,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1916).

Quoted

in

Bredthauer v. Bredthauer, 2013 WY 136, 312 P.3d 83,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Oct 31, 2013).

§ 5-3-402.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008,
ch. 27, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1909, ch. 152, § 2, pertained to the qualifications, supervision, and removal for cause of court reporters.

Laws 2008, ch. 27, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2008.

§ 5-3-403.
Duties generally; oath; furnishing transcripts.

Such reporter shall be
in constant attendance upon the judge of said court at all times,
and shall be the clerk and stenographer of the judge, and he shall
be sworn to the faithful performance of his duty, and take the oath
of office required in the constitution of this state, and shall remain
in attendance on the court, and take full stenographic notes in cases
tried during said attendance, of all testimony or admissions made
by either side, objections to the introduction of testimony, the ruling
of the court thereon, the exceptions taken thereto, and such other
proceedings as the court may direct, and shall preserve such stenographic
notes and furnish a transcript thereof, or of any part of same, upon
the request of any party having an interest therein, provided, however,
that if no request for such transcript shall be made to the court
reporter for a period of ten (10) years subsequent to the hearing
of any cause wherein stenographic records have been taken, the said
court reporter may destroy his original stenographic records, and,
provided, further, however, that if a transcript shall be furnished
any party as provided herein, then and in that event, the court reporter
may destroy his original stenographic records within a period of ten
(10) years from and after the furnishing of said transcript to the
party or parties ordering same.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 152, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 942; C.S. 1920, § 1168; Laws 1921, ch. 102, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 31-239; C.S. 1945, § 1-624; Laws 1947, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-79.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

Generally. —

In a manslaughter case, the district court's sua sponte revision of the trial transcript was not improper as the district court acted reasonably in ordering the trial transcript to be amended to comport with the actual testimony.
Bromley v. State, 2009 WY 133, 219 P.3d 110,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2009).

Reporter should perform duties without delay. —

The official court stenographer serves as an officer of the district court and his prescribed duties should be performed with fidelity and without unnecessary delay. Richardson v. State, 15 Wyo. 465, 89 P. 1027,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1907).

And failure may be grounds for new trial. —

Court might grant new trial where, solely on account of failure of official court stenographer (now reporter), upon request, to furnish complete transcript of evidence, rulings and exceptions within time allowed, complaining party was prevented from presenting all the necessary evidence to a review. Richardson v. State, 15 Wyo. 465, 89 P. 1027,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1907).

Even though court directs reporter to strike remarks. —

Defendant was entitled to new trial, where court refused to make record of remarks of state's counsel in argument on motion, and ordered any remarks taken down to be stricken out. State v. Thomas, 38 Wyo. 72, 264 P. 1017,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1928).

Court reporter's notes are not required to be filed

with the papers of the case. Harris v. State, 23 Wyo. 487, 153 P. 881,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1916).

Reporter's attendance not required after parties rest. —

This provision does not necessarily require the attendance of the court reporter in a proceeding after the parties rest, although it is highly inadvisable to excuse him until the verdict has been returned, especially in a murder case. State v. Riggle, 76 Wyo. 1, 298 P.2d 349,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1956).

Notation of attendance at trial part of record. —

This section, which, after enumerating what the stenographic notes of the court reporter shall contain, also enumerates “such other proceedings as the court may direct.” Thus, a notation by the court reporter as to the attendance at a rape trial was in the record and would not be expunged by the supreme court. State v. Holm, 67 Wyo. 360, 224 P.2d 500,

1950 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1950).

Quoted

in

Farbotnik v. State, 850 P.2d 594,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 1993).

Law reviews. —

For article “Mechanically Produced Evidence,” see 3 Wyo. L.J. 221.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Failure or refusal of state court judge to have record made of bench conference with counsel in criminal proceeding, 31 ALR5th 704.

§ 5-3-404.
Criminal cases; reporting and transcript of proceedings.

The court reporter for
criminal cases prosecuted in the district court shall report all testimony
and all proceedings held in open court, except informal discussions,
informal instruction conferences and pretrial conferences which shall
be reported when requested by a party. The reporter shall, within
a reasonable time, transcribe arraignment, plea, change of plea and
sentencing hearings and file the transcript in the official court
record.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 60, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-79.1; Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Generally. —

In a manslaughter case, the district court's sua sponte revision of the trial transcript was not improper as the district court acted reasonably in ordering the trial transcript to be amended to comport with the actual testimony.
Bromley v. State, 2009 WY 133, 219 P.3d 110,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2009).

§ 5-3-405.
Criminal cases; post-conviction proceedings.

In any case arising as
a post conviction relief proceeding, W.S.

7-14-101

through

7-14-108

, in which the presiding judge has determined that the
post conviction petition is sufficient to require an answer, the court
reporter shall transcribe the record of the criminal proceeding in
which the petitioner was convicted in full unless the court shall,
by written order, determine that portions of the record are not required
or material for decision in the proceeding. Additionally, the court
reporter shall record evidentiary proceedings conducted under this
section and shall transcribe that record if an appeal is taken.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 60, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 5-79.2; Laws 1992, ch. 25, § 3.

Generally. —

In a manslaughter case, the district court's sua sponte revision of the trial transcript was not improper as the district court acted reasonably in ordering the trial transcript to be amended to comport with the actual testimony.
Bromley v. State, 2009 WY 133, 219 P.3d 110,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2009).

Requirements for furnishing of transcripts at state expense.
—

Two requirements must be met before the district court is required to furnish a transcript for a defendant at the state's expense: (1) The defendant must file a petition seeking constitutional relief; and (2) the district court must determine that the petition has merit. Escobedo v. State, 601 P.2d 1028,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 499

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 5-3-406.
Criminal cases; original and copy of transcript to be furnished when
required by order.

The official court reporter
shall transcribe and furnish an original and copy of the proceedings
at the trial of any person sentenced to any imprisonment where an
order is or has been entered so requiring.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 60, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 5-79.3.

Requirements for furnishing of transcripts at state expense.
—

Two requirements must be met before the district court is required to furnish a transcript for a defendant at the state's expense: (1) The defendant must file a petition seeking constitutional relief; and (2) the district court must determine that the petition has merit. Escobedo v. State, 601 P.2d 1028,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 499

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 5-3-407.
Criminal cases; payment of fees; form and contents of certificate.

The reporter shall be
paid in full for all his services in connection with the transcribing
and filing or furnishing the transcripts referred to in this act [§§

5-3-404

through

5-3-407

], the same fee for the transcribing, filing, and furnishing
of transcripts as provided in W.S.

5-3-410

. All such fees shall be paid out of the state treasury
on the warrant of the state auditor from appropriations made for such
purpose, upon presentation of a certificate signed by the presiding
judge setting the amount due said reporter. Such certificate shall
as to each original transcript, and copy where fee for copy is authorized,
set forth the title and number of the cause in which the transcript
was required to be furnished, the nature of the proceedings transcribed,
whether an arraignment, proceedings at criminal trial or proceedings
at post conviction hearing, and the fee approved therefor. The state
auditor may prescribe the form of the certificate and furnish same.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 60, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 5-79.4.

§ 5-3-408.
Bond.

Each official reporter,
appointed as aforesaid, shall give a bond to the state of Wyoming,
with sufficient sureties, to be approved by the judge of the district
court of such district, and filed with the secretary of state, in
the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), conditioned for the faithful
and efficient performance of the duties of said office.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 152, § 4; C.S. 1910, § 943; C.S. 1920, § 1169; R.S. 1931, § 31-240; C.S. 1945, § 1-625; W.S. 1957, § 5-80.

Cited

in

Harris v. State, 23 Wyo. 487, 153 P. 881,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1916).

§ 5-3-409.
Duty as judge's stenographer.

Each official reporter
appointed under the provisions of this act [§§

5-3-401

through

5-3-403

,

5-3-408

through

5-3-412

], as court reporter, shall also be the stenographer of
the judge of said court, and shall do and perform such stenographic
labor for the judge of said court as of him or her may be required
in his official capacity as judge.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 152, § 6; C.S. 1910, § 945; C.S. 1920, § 1171; R.S. 1931, § 31-242; C.S. 1945, § 1-627; W.S. 1957, § 5-81.

Cited

in

Harris v. State, 23 Wyo. 487, 153 P. 881,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1916).

§ 5-3-410.
Fees for transcripts and records.

through (d) Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 18, § 1.

The reporter may charge three dollars and twenty-five cents ($3.25) per page of twenty-five (25) lines, for all transcripts, records and other papers required to be made and issued as the official reporter. At no additional charge, the reporter shall include one (1) copy for the party ordering the original. The reporter may charge one dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) per page for each additional copy, and may require payment in advance or upon delivery.

The fees which have been paid for reporting by the requesting party may be taxed as costs against the unsuccessful party.

Immediately upon conclusion of the proceeding, the reporter shall notify the clerk of the court of the fees which have been paid by the respective parties to the action, for the purpose of taxing costs.

All fees paid to the court reporter for reporting services under W.S.

5-3-403

shall be paid into the state treasury as soon as practicable after the first Monday of each month after the services are performed. The court reporter is liable upon his official bond for collecting and transmitting reporting fees to the state treasury.”

Cited

in

Harris v. State, 23 Wyo. 487, 153 P. 881,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1916); ELA v. AAB, 2016 WY 98, 382 P.3d 45,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 109

(Wyo. 2016).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law — An Indigent's Right to a Free Trial Transcript. Mayer v. City of Chicago, 404 U.S. 189, 30 L. Ed. 2d 372, 92 S. Ct. 410, 1971 U.S. LEXIS 298 (1971),” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 707 (1972).

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 152, § 7; C.S. 1910, § 946; C.S. 1920, § 1172; Laws 1921, ch. 102, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 21-243; Laws 1945, ch. 48, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 1-628; Laws 1955, ch. 91, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-82; Laws 1963, ch. 70, § 1; 1975, ch. 116, § 1; 1981, ch. 116, § 1; 1989, ch. 95, § 1; 2001, ch. 157, § 1; 2014 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to costs and fees in district courts, see §

5-3-206

.

As to duty of officer to post fees and as to penalty for failure to comply, see §

1-14-113

.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, repealed former (a) through (d) which read: “(a) In all civil cases the official court
reporter shall collect a fee of forty-five dollars ($45.00) per day for reporting, as set forth in
W.S.

5-3-403

. The fee is payable in advance by the parties who request
the reporting service. The fee shall be paid into the state treasury.

§ 5-3-411.
Salary.

Each official district
court reporter in this state shall be paid annual salaries as provided
by law, payable in equal monthly installments upon warrant of the
state auditor upon the state treasurer.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 152, § 8; C.S. 1910, § 947; Laws 1917, ch. 48, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1173; R.S. 1931, § 31-244; Laws 1949, ch. 40, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 1-629; Laws 1947, ch. 81, § 1; 1949, ch. 65, § 3; 1953, ch. 79, § 1; 1957, ch. 157, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 5-83; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 5; 1965, ch. 115, § 4; 1967, ch. 181, § 33; 1969, ch. 168, § 9.

Cross references. —

For amount of salary, see §

9-3-101

.

Cited

in

Harris v. State, 23 Wyo. 487, 153 P. 881,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1916).

§ 5-3-412.
Substitute during absence or disability.

In case of sickness or
if said official court reporter be unable to attend to his official
duties from any cause at any time, the judge of the district court
in each judicial district in this state, when the trial of cases required
to be reported necessitates it, is authorized and empowered to obtain
a suitable and competent person as substitute for such official court
reporter, during such disability; such substitute to receive the fees
herein provided for in full compensation for such services. And in
all cases where any signature of the official court reporter is required,
the same, during the absence or any such disability of the official
court reporter shall be signed by the person substituted therefor
as acting official court reporter, and in such cases the same shall
have the same legal force and effect as if signed by the official
court reporter.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 152, § 9; C.S. 1910, § 948; C.S. 1920, § 1174; R.S. 1931, § 31-245; C.S. 1945, § 1-630; W.S. 1957, § 5-84.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1909, ch. 152, § 11, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Abuse of Discretion. —

In a divorce case, although a trial court abused its discretion by refusing to allow the use of a substitute reporter to transcribe the proceedings and prepare an official transcript, there was no prejudice shown; the purpose for the time notification was for the convenience of the official court reporter. The error was harmless because a trial transcript was unnecessary since the parties stipulated to all pertinent facts and exhibits upon which the trial court made detailed findings in its decision letters. Bredthauer v. Bredthauer, 2013 WY 136, 312 P.3d 83,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2013).

Cited

in

Harris v. State, 23 Wyo. 487, 153 P. 881,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1916).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Court reporter's death or disability prior to transcribing notes as grounds for reversal or new trial, 57 ALR4th 1049.